Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6320
Lead abatement project; firm; license required.

Except as otherwise provided in the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Practice Act, a firm shall not engage in an abatement project unless the firm holds a license for that purpose.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 168;

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 43;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1273.